Rhode Island statutes. Title 2 Agriculture and Forestry
Part 1 General Provisions

2-1-1 — 2-1-4.
[Superseded.]

2-1-5.
Agricultural institutes — Local associations.

The director of environmental management shall hold one agricultural institute in each county annually, either independently or in connection with any society, association, or other organization devoted to the same general objects, and may hold as many
more as he or she deems expedient, and, as far as may be practicable, encourage state and local associations and societies in the interests of agriculture.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 4; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 4; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 201, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-5

.

2-1-6.
Annual report — Publications.

The director of environmental management shall report annually to the general assembly at its January session. Two thousand (2,000) copies of the report shall be printed under the direction of the department of administration. The director shall distribute
one copy of the report to each member of the general assembly, one to the city or town clerk of each town in the state for the use of the city or town, one to each public library, and a proper number to the University of Rhode Island,
agricultural societies, farmers’ clubs and granges in the state, and shall make any exchanges with other like organizations as may be deemed expedient. The director may cause to be printed and distributed from time to time, in pamphlet
form, an analysis of commercial fertilizers, and any other information that the interests of agriculture may require.

History of Section. G.L. 1896, ch. 99, § 7; G.L. 1909, ch. 120, § 7; G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 201, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2727, art. 1, § 2; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-6

.

2-1-7.
[Obsolete.]

2-1-8.
Promotion of Rhode Island grown farm products and Rhode Island seafood.

The director of environmental management shall establish and administer a program to promote the marketing of Rhode Island seafood and farm products grown and produced in Rhode Island for the purpose of encouraging the development of the commercial fishing
and agricultural sectors in the state. The director of environmental management shall:

Collect and diffuse timely information relative to the seasonal supply, demand and prevailing prices of seafood and farm products, both at wholesale and retail, the movement of seafood and farm products through commercial channels, and the quantities
and conditions of seafood and farm products in dry and cold storage.

Assist and advise in the organization and maintenance of producers’ and consumers’ cooperative selling and buying associations.

Investigate the cost of distributing seafood and farm products, both at wholesale and retail, and to publish these findings that may be of practical interest to the public.

Furnish advice and assistance to the public with reference to buying of seafood and farm products and other matters relative to seafood and farm products.

Take those lawful measures that may be deemed advisable to prevent waste or uneconomical use of seafood and farm products.

Cooperate with various state and federal agencies having to do with seafood and farm products.

Conduct efforts to promote interaction and business relationships between farmers, fishermen and restaurants, grocery stores, institutional cafeterias and other potential institutional purchasers of Rhode Island seafood and Rhode Island grown farm products,
including, but not limited to:

Organizing state-wide or regional events promoting Rhode Island grown or harvested seafood and farm products, where farmers, fishermen, and potential institutional customers are invited to participate. The director shall use his or her best efforts to
solicit cooperation and participation from the farm, corporate, retail, wholesale and grocery communities in such advertising, internet-related and event planning efforts.

The director shall report annually to the general assembly having cognizance of matters relating to the environment on issues with respect to efforts undertaken pursuant to the requirements of this section. The director may adopt, in accordance with §

2-1-9

, such regulations as deemed necessary to carry out the purposes of this section.

History of Section. G.L. 1938, ch. 241, § 34; P.L. 1928, ch. 1181, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 209, § 2; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-8

; P.L. 2012, ch. 37, § 2; P.L. 2012, ch. 38, § 2.

2-1-9.
Enforcement of marketing laws.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management to assist in the enforcement of the provisions of §§

2-1-8

—

2-1-12

, chapter 6 of this title and chapters 17 and 18 of title 21, and the provisions of any rule or regulations promulgated by the director of the department of environmental management to carry out those provisions. The
general assembly shall annually appropriate any sum it may deem necessary to pay the salary and expenses of the director of environmental management.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 36, as enacted by P.L. 1926, ch. 789, § 1; P.L. 1927, ch. 1014, § 4; P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 149; G.L. 1938, ch. 209, § 3; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-9

.

2-1-10.
Inspection powers.

For the purpose of conducting inspections, the director of environmental management and the director of health, or any of his or her agents or deputies, have authority to enter, at any reasonable time, any building, storehouse, warehouse, cold-storage
plant, packing house, stockyard, railroad yard, railroad car, or any other building or place where farm products are produced, kept, stored, or offered for sale, or to enter upon any farm land for the purpose of inspecting farm
products.

The director of the department of environmental management, through the division of agriculture, shall continue to enforce the commercial growers of fruits and vegetables voluntary food safety program developed by the Food and Drug Administration and
the United States Department of Agriculture known as Good Agricultural Practices (GAP), and shall enforce the Food Safety Modernization Act as it pertains to commercial growers of fruits and vegetables.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 37, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1181, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 209, § 4; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 160; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-10

; P.L. 2017, ch. 213, § 1; P.L. 2017, ch. 243, § 1.

2-1-10.1.
Assent to food safety modernization act.

The state of Rhode Island assents to the provisions of the act of Congress entitled “FDA Food Safety Modernization Act,” 21 U.S.C. § 2201 et seq., and the director of environmental management is authorized, empowered, and directed to perform those acts
relating to produce on the farm that may be necessary for the modernization of the safety of the food supply, as defined in that act of Congress, in compliance with that act and with the rules and regulations promulgated by the Food
and Drug Administration that are consistent with that act.

History of Section.
P.L. 2019, ch. 122, § 1; P.L. 2019, ch. 134, § 1.

2-1-11.
Administration of oaths — Subpoena of witnesses and papers.

The director of environmental management and the director of health have the power to administer oaths, summon and examine witnesses and order the production and examination of books, accounts, papers, records and documents in any proceeding within the
jurisdiction of these directors. All subpoenas, and orders for the production of books, accounts, papers, records and documents shall be signed and issued by the directors and served as subpoenas in civil cases in the superior court
as now served, and witnesses so subpoenaed shall be entitled to the same fees for attendance and travel as provided for witnesses in civil cases in the superior court. If the person subpoenaed to attend before the directors fails to
obey the command of the subpoena without reasonable cause, or if a person in attendance before the directors, without reasonable cause, refuses to be sworn, or to be examined, or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or if any
person refuses to produce the books, accounts, papers, records and documents material to the issue, set forth in an order duly served on the person, the directors, as the case may be, may apply to any justice of the superior court
for any county, upon proof by affidavit of the fact, for a rule or order returnable in not less than two (2) nor more than five (5) days, directing the person to show cause before the justice who made the order or any other justice,
why the person should not be adjudged in contempt. Upon the return of the order, the justice before whom the matter is brought for a hearing shall examine under oath the person, and the person shall be given an opportunity to be heard,
and if the justice determines that the person has refused without reasonable cause or legal excuse to be examined or to answer a legal and pertinent question, or to produce books, accounts, papers, records and documents, material to
the issue, which the person was ordered to bring or produce, the justice may forthwith commit the offender to jail, to remain until the person submits to do the act which the person was required to do, or is discharged according to
law.

History of Section. G.L.1923, ch. 241, § 38, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1181, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 209, § 5; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-11

.

2-1-12.
Enforcement of provisions — Prosecutions.

It is the duty of the director of environmental management and the director of health to enforce the provisions of §§

2-1-8

—

2-1-12

and to prosecute every person, firm or corporation violating the provisions. If in the judgment of the directors any person, firm or corporation has deliberately violated the provisions of §§

2-1-8

—

2-1-12

or of chapter 6 of this title or chapter 17 or 18 of title 21, the directors shall inform the attorney general who shall prosecute in the manner provided by law. Whenever any prosecution takes place, the director of environmental
management and the director of health, or any of his or her agents or deputies, are not required to give surety for the payment of costs.

History of Section. G.L. 1923, ch. 241, § 39, as enacted by P.L. 1928, ch. 1181, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 209, § 6; G.L. 1956, §

2-1-12

.

2-1-13 — 2-1-17.
Repealed.